Utah statutes.
49-11-608.   False statements or records -- Unlawfully cashing benefit checks.

(1) A person who knowingly makes any false statement, or who falsifies or permits to be falsified any record necessary for carrying out the intent of this title is in violation of Section 76-6-504.

(2) A person cashing a benefit check to which that person is not entitled is in violation of Section 76-6-501.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

